Alabama, session 2026rs, HB25.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) No person may inject, release, or
disperse, by any means, a chemical, a chemical compound, a
substance, or an apparatus into the atmosphere within or above
this state for the purpose of affecting the weather, including
temperature, climate, and intensity of sunlight.
(b) A person that violates subsection (a) shall be
guilty of a Class B misdemeanor and shall be fined not more
than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). Each violation
shall be a separate offense.
(c)(1) All fines collected pursuant to subsection (b)
shall be deposited in the Alabama Air Pollution Control Fund
that is hereby established in the State Treasury. The fund
shall be administered by the Alabama Department of
Environmental Management for reducing air pollution in this
state.
(2) Receipts deposited into the fund shall be disbursed
only by warrants of the Comptroller drawn upon the State
Treasury on itemized vouchers approved by the director of the
department. No funds shall be withdrawn or expended except as
budgeted and allotted according to Sections 41-4-80 to
41-4-96, Code of Alabama 1975, inclusive, and Sections
41-19-1 to 41-19-12, Code of Alabama 1975, inclusive, and only
in amounts as stipulated in the general appropriations act,
Page 2

in amounts as stipulated in the general appropriations act,
HB25 INTRODUCED
other appropriation acts, or this section. At the end of each
fiscal year, any unencumbered balance shall not revert to the
State General Fund under Section 41-4-93, Code of Alabama
1975.
(d)(1) Any person who observes a violation of
subsection (a) may submit a report of the violation to the
Alabama Department of Environmental Management on the
department's website or by telephone, United States mail, or
electronic mail.
(2) The department shall establish a publicly available
email address and online form to allow the reporting of
violations.
(e) The Alabama Department of Environmental Management
shall adopt rules to administer this section.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3